District of Columbia statutes.
22-2751

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Demonstration” means marching, congregating, standing, parading, demonstrating, or patrolling by one or more persons, with or without signs, for the purpose of persuading one or more individuals, or the public, or to protest some action, attitude, or belief.

(2)

“Mask” means a covering for the face or part of the face whereby the identity of the wearer is disguised. The term “Mask” shall not include clothing worn for the purpose of providing protection from the elements nor clothing worn as a religious covering.

(3)

“Residence” means a building or structure, but not a hotel, used or designed to be used, in whole or in part, as a living or a sleeping place by one or more human beings.

May 26, 2011, D.C. Law 18-374, § 2, 58 DCR 715